Wyoming statutes. Title 8 General Provisions
Chapter 1 Common Law, Statutes and Rules of Construction

§ 8-1-101.
Adoption of common law.

The common law of England as modified by judicial decisions, so far as the same is of a general nature and not inapplicable, and all declaratory or remedial acts or statutes made in aid of, or to supply the defects of the common law prior to the fourth year of James the First (excepting the second section of the sixth chapter of forty-third Elizabeth, the eighth chapter of thirteenth Elizabeth and ninth chapter of thirty-seventh Henry Eighth) and which are of a general nature and not local to England, are the rule of decision in this state when not inconsistent with the laws thereof, and are considered as of full force until repealed by legislative authority.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 26, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 498; R.S. 1899, § 2695; C.S. 1910, § 3588; C.S. 1920, § 4547; R.S. 1931, § 26-101; C.S. 1945, § 16-301; W.S. 1957, § 8-17; W.S. 1977, §

8-3-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

I. General Consideration.

II. Illustrative Cases.

§ 8-1-102.
Definitions.

As used in the statutes unless the legislature clearly specifies a different meaning or interpretation or the context clearly requires a different meaning:

“Adult” means a person who is not a minor;

“Bond” includes an undertaking;

When used in a context denoting age:

“Majority” means that period of time when a person is an adult;

“Minor” means a person who has not yet reached the eighteenth anniversary of his birth;

“Minority” means that period of time when a person is a minor.

“Month” means a calendar month, and “year” means a calendar year; the word “year” is equivalent to the words, “year of our Lord”;

“Oath” includes affirmation;

“Person” includes an individual, partnership, corporation, joint stock company or any other association or entity, public or private;

“Preceding” and “following,” when referring to sections in statutes, mean the sections next preceding or next following that in which the words occur, unless some other section is designated;

“Will” includes the words “testament” and “codicil”;

“Written” and “in writing” include printing, lithographing or other modes of representing words and letters, but in all cases if the written signature of any person is required the proper handwriting of that person, or his mark, is intended;

“District attorney” includes a county and prosecuting attorney in a county where the office of district attorney has not been created. This definition shall specifically not apply to W.S.

9-1-801

through

9-1-811

;

“State penal institution” includes the Wyoming state penitentiary, Wyoming state penitentiary farms and camps, Wyoming women’s center, Wyoming correctional facility, community correctional facilities defined by W.S. 7-18-102(a)(i) and any other state penal institution created by law for the incarceration of convicted felons;

“Elected state official” means the governor, secretary of state, state auditor, state treasurer and superintendent of public instruction;

“Intellectual disability” means significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning with concurrent deficits in adaptive behavior manifested during the developmental period. “Intellectually disabled” means a person with an intellectual disability;

“Notarial officer” means a notary public or other officer authorized to perform notarial acts as defined in W.S. 32-3-102(a)(xviii);

“Last federal census” means the last official federal decennial census as conducted and officially corrected by the bureau of census, including any changes for boundary modifications, to become effective on July 1 next following the receipt of the official census figures;

“Population” of a city, town, county, legislative district or other political subdivision shall be determined by resort to the last federal census;

“Surrender” when referring to a driver’s license or identification card means as provided in W.S.

31-7-131

;

“Personal digital identity” means the intangible digital representation of, by and for a natural person, over which he has principal authority and through which he intentionally communicates or acts;

“Organizational digital identity” means the intangible digital representation of, by and for a corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, governmental agency, public corporation or any other legal or commercial entity that is not a natural person, over which it has principal authority and through which it intentionally communicates or acts;

“Honorable discharge” or “honorably discharged,” for purposes of law providing Wyoming benefits or exemptions, shall include any veteran of the United States armed forces or national guard whose discharge was general or other than honorable solely as a result of having refused a vaccine for COVID-19 as defined in W.S. 1-1-141(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 3, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2724; C.S. 1910, § 3617; C.S. 1920, § 4570; R.S. 1931, § 112-101; C.S. 1945, § 16-402; W.S. 1957, § 8-18; Laws 1973, ch. 10, § 1; ch. 213, § 1; 1975, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

8-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1; 1983, ch. 25, § 1; 1992, ch. 25, § 3; 1993, ch. 1, § 1; 2004, ch. 132, § 2; 2008, ch. 20, § 2; ch. 70, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1; 2020 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 27, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 63, § 2, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 41, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to meaning of words in statutes relating to crimes, see §

6-1-104

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(xii).

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 20, §
2, effective July 1, 2008, added (a)(xiv).

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 70, §
1, added (a)(xiii).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(xv) and (a)(xvi).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xvii).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 27, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "32-3-102(a)(xviii)" for "34-26-101(b)(iii)" in (a)(xiv).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 63, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, added (a)(xviii) and (a)(xix).

The 2022 amendment

added (a)(xx).

Laws 2022, ch. 41, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3 provides:

“(a) No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b) No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

“Person.” —

The term “person,” as defined in subsection (a)(vi), is the meaning the legislature intended to incorporate into the restitution statutes when it utilized the term in the definition of a “victim.” DCI. Merkison v. State, 996 P.2d 1138,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2000).

In a welfare fraud case where restitution was ordered, a victim impact statement from the Wyoming Department of Family Services was properly considered because the Department was a “person.” Shafer v. State, 2015 WY 38, 344 P.3d 284,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2015).

Cited in

Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Zelikovitz, 923 P.2d 740,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part IV,” 10 Land & Water L. Rev. 155 (1975).

§ 8-1-103.
Rules of construction for statutes.

The construction of all statutes of this state shall be by the following rules, unless that construction is plainly contrary to the intent of the legislature:

Words and phrases shall be taken in their ordinary and usual sense, but technical words and phrases having a peculiar and appropriate meaning in law shall be understood according to their technical import;

Words importing joint authority to three (3) or more persons shall be construed as authority to a majority of those persons, unless otherwise declared in the law giving the authority;

Reference to a numbered section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph or other subdivision “of the statutes” and the abbreviation “W.S.” when used in conjunction with a statute section number or its designation or identification means the Wyoming Statutes in their most recently published form including amendments to original enactments;

Words in the present tense include the future tense;

Words in the plural form include the singular and words in the singular form include the plural;

Words in the masculine gender include the feminine and neuter genders;

Any uniform act shall be interpreted and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it;

If any provision of any act enacted by the Wyoming legislature or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of any such act are severable;

Reference to legislative salary, per diem or compensation in any statute establishing the amount of salary, per diem or compensation to be paid a person who is not a legislator, shall be deemed a reference only to the rate of legislative salary, per diem or compensation set by statute and shall not be construed to authorize the payment of salary for meeting preparation days as provided for legislators under W.S. 28-5-101(e)(iii) or the payment of salary for travel days provided for legislators under W.S. 28-5-101(e)(iv);

Reference to the “cooperative tribal governing body” means the inter-tribal council of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho tribes or its official successor joint governing body. If the cooperative tribal governing body is a party to a cooperative agreement or contract with the state or a political subdivision under the laws of this state, a successor joint tribal governing body or each tribe as an individual sovereign shall remain a party to the agreement or contract unless specified otherwise in the agreement or contract.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 3, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2724; C.S. 1910, § 3617; C.S. 1920, § 4570; R.S. 1931, § 112-101; C.S. 1945, § 16-402; W.S. 1957, § 8-18; Laws 1973, ch. 10, § 1; 1975, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

8-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1; 1979, ch. 32, § 1; 2008, ch. 16, § 1; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to construction of code of civil procedure, see §

1-1-101

.

As to general definitions and rules of construction for the Uniform Commercial Code, see § 34.1-1-101 et seq.

The 2008 amendment,

effective January 5, 2009, added (a)(ix).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(x).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

I. General Consideration.

II. Particular Words and Phrases.

§ 8-1-104.
Identification of laws amended or repealed in amending or repealing acts.

In amending, altering or repealing any of the laws of Wyoming, it is sufficient to identify each of the laws to be so amended, altered or repealed by designating the particular section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph or other subdivision of the statutes affected by the appropriate number or letter, or by the appropriate chapter and section of a session law if the law to be amended, altered or repealed is not a numbered statute, and it is not necessary to refer by title or otherwise to the original legislative enactment, or amendment thereof, to be so affected. Each bill for an act to amend, alter or repeal any laws in effect, but not yet published, shall refer to the laws by their title and the date of approval by the governor. Nothing in this section shall be construed as altering any rule or requirement that any portion of an enactment being amended shall be set forth in full.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 3, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2725; C.S. 1910, § 3618; C.S. 1920, § 4571; R.S. 1931, § 112-102; Laws 1941, ch. 43, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 16-401; Laws 1947, ch. 2, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 8-19; W.S. 1977, §

8-3-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

Applied

in

Long v. State, 745 P.2d 547,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

Alberts v. State, 745 P.2d 898,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 539

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutional requirement that repealing statute refer to statute repealed as applicable to repeal by implication, 5 ALR2d 1270.

§ 8-1-105.
Identification and designation of sections, subsections and other divisions of bills; duty to insert; method.

Each section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, indented clause or other subdivision of every bill for any act, memorial or resolution which may be introduced in either house of the legislature shall be appropriately and systematically identified and designated by number or letter before the bill is introduced. The legislative service office shall select and insert the identification and designation numbers and letters, whenever needed. In arranging and furnishing copies of the laws passed at each session of the legislature for the printer of the session laws or the Wyoming statutes, the legislative service office shall select and insert the appropriate and systematic identification and designation numbers and letters.

If any bill is for amendment of a prior enactment in which sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs and other subdivisions are appropriately identified and designated according to a consistent pattern or system, the identification and designation of portions of the bill may conform to that pattern or system, but otherwise shall be accomplished in accordance with the following rules, as nearly as practicable:

The first or only section in a bill shall be identified as section 1, and any following sections shall be identified by Arabic numerals in sequence;

Statute sections within a bill shall be identified by the appropriate title, chapter and section number as:

8-1-105

;

Subsections (divisions of sections) shall be identified by lower case letters in parentheses as: (a), (b), (c), etc.;

Paragraphs (divisions of subsections) shall be identified by lower case Roman numerals in parentheses, as: (i), (ii), (iii), etc.;

Subparagraphs (divisions of paragraphs) shall be identified by upper case letters in parentheses, as: (A), (B), (C), etc.;

Subdivisions of subparagraphs shall be identified by upper case Roman numerals in parentheses, and any smaller subdivisions shall be identified in accordance with the pattern and system established by this subsection, again starting with Arabic numerals.

The legislative service office may also insert appropriate statute section numbers and section headnotes in a bill for an act. However, statute numbers and headnotes are for reference, identification, and to facilitate preparation of copy for printing only, and do not constitute any part of the substantive law of the enactment. The legislative service office may change statute section numbers or headnotes before or after passage of the act as necessary to correct errors or conform statute numbers or headnotes to reflect amendments made by the legislature to the text of the bill.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 211, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 8-19.1; Laws 1973, ch. 51, § 1; 1975, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

8-3-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-1-106.
Effect of repeal of repealing law.

If any law is repealed which repealed a former law, the former law is not thereby revived unless it is expressly provided.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 3, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 2726; C.S. 1910, § 3619; C.S. 1920, § 4572; R.S. 1931, § 112-103; C.S. 1945, § 16-403; W.S. 1957, § 8-20; W.S. 1977, §

8-3-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-1-107.
Effect of amendment or repeal on pending actions.

If a statute is repealed or amended, the repeal or amendment does not affect pending actions, prosecutions or proceedings, civil or criminal. If the repeal or amendment relates to the remedy, it does not affect pending actions, prosecutions or proceedings, unless so expressed, nor shall any repeal or amendment affect causes of action, prosecutions or proceedings existing at the time of the amendment or repeal, unless otherwise expressly provided in the amending or repealing act.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 9, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 4573; R.S. 1931, § 112-104; C.S. 1945, § 16-404; W.S. 1957, § 8-21; W.S. 1977, §

8-3-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

In general. —

Based on the express language in this section, the Wyoming Legislature did not intend to affect any already-initiated court action by a statutory repeal or amendment made during the pendency of that action, unless the repeal or amendment went to the remedy available through that action and if the Legislature expressly noted in the repealing or amending act that it intended to apply the change in remedy to pending actions. The statute also preserves “existing” but not yet “pending” court actions unless a repealing or amending act expressly sets out a contrary intent. Roush v. State, 2014 WY 45, 322 P.3d 34,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2014).

Repealed criminal law. —

State could initiate a third degree sexual assault prosecution in 2011 for conduct which preceded the repeal of a criminal statute by more than 4 years because this was permitted under the general saving statute in this section; the saving statute permitted a prosecution for a violation of the law that had been repealed before the prosecution was initiated. Roush v. State, 2014 WY 45, 322 P.3d 34,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2014).

Rule that retrospective legislation is not favored applies to workmen's compensation cases.

Mustanen v. Diamond Coal & Coke Co., 50 Wyo. 462, 62 P.2d 287,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1936).

Retroactive application improper. —

When making factual findings on remand as to a private road, a board of county commissioners could not retroactively apply amended versions of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

24-9-101

and certify the matter to the district court. This section barred such application, although the amendments were procedural, because it would not prevent a manifest injustice; moreover, allowing the district court to exercise jurisdiction as the fact finding body when it previously had acted in an appellate capacity would lead to absurd results, and the previous remand instructions had not been directed to the district court.
Mullinax Concrete Serv. Co. v. Zowada, 2012 WY 55, 275 P.3d 474,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2012).

Application for workmen's compensation is pending proceeding. —

An application for compensation under the Workmen's Compensation Law results in a pending “proceeding” within the provisions of this section. Claim of Heil, 65 Wyo. 175, 197 P.2d 692,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1948).

Cause of action exists at time of injury. —

A cause of action under the Workmen's Compensation Law exists, within the meaning of this section, in favor of an employee at the time he receives an injury in the course of his employment. Claim of Heil, 65 Wyo. 175, 197 P.2d 692,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1948).

Repeal of a statute authorizing an action against a guardian

for the care of an insane ward at the state hospital did not destroy the cause of action. State v. Thompson, 45 Wyo. 350, 18 P.2d 619,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1933).

Applied

in

Wyoming Ref. Co. v. Bottjen, 695 P.2d 647,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 460

(Wyo. 1985); Reiman Constr. Co. v. Jerry Hiller Co., 709 P.2d 1271,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 620

(Wyo. 1985); Aden v. State, 761 P.2d 88,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1988); Meridian Aggregates Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 827 P.2d 375,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1992).

Quoted

in

In re Estate of Boyd, 606 P.2d 1243,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 240

(Wyo. 1980); Montez v. State, 2009 WY 17, 201 P.3d 434,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Feb. 12, 2009); Manzanares v. State, 2015 WY 63,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Apr. 29, 2015).

Cited

in

Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 7 P.3d 900,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2000).

In general. —

2018 amendment to the criminal stalking statute did not affect an action because it was commenced in 2017. Dugan v. State, 2019 WY 112, 451 P.3d 731,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2019), cert. denied, 140 S. Ct. 1298, 206 L. Ed. 2d 377, 2020 U.S. LEXIS 1610 (U.S. 2020).

§ 8-1-108.
When laws take effect.

Every law takes effect ninety (90) days after the adjournment of the session of the legislature at which it was enacted, unless a different effective date is specified therein.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 3, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 44; C.S. 1910, § 49; C.S. 1920, § 56; R.S. 1931, § 112-105; C.S. 1945, § 16-405; W.S. 1957, § 8-22; W.S. 1977, §

8-3-109

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

Cited

in

Department of Revenue & Taxation v. Shipley, 579 P.2d 415,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 8-1-109.
Payment of fines and penalties.

Unless otherwise specifically provided by law, all civil or administrative fines or penalties collected under the Wyoming statutes shall be paid over to the state treasurer to be credited to the public school fund of the county in which the violation for which the fine or penalty was imposed occurred.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 1.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to fines and penalties belonging to the public school fund, see art. 7, § 5, Wyo. Const.

For provision as to paying all fines under the general laws of the state into the county treasury to the credit of the public school fund of the county, see §

5-9-106

.

As to distribution to school districts of money in the common school account for use of public schools, see §

21-13-301

.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 157, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2005.